Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 9

TANF — Self-Employment Project Exemption

71-3-901. Purpose of part.

The purpose of this part is to invest in the self-sufficiency of temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) recipients, or successor program.

Acts 1996, ch. 886, § 1.

71-3-902. “Low-income entrepreneur” defined.

For the purpose of this part, unless the context otherwise requires, a low-income entrepreneur is one who is starting or expanding a business and who meets the eligibility criteria for receipt of temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), or successor program.

Acts 1996, ch. 886, § 2.

71-3-903. Self-employment profits not counted against public assistance benefits.

Low-income entrepreneurs will be allowed to escrow profits from their business enterprise that are not reinvested into their business into an account, which will be placed in a micro-lending intermediary program and not be counted against their public assistance benefits until they accumulate five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the period they are eligible for the temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) or successor program. Under this provision, participating entrepreneurs, who are otherwise eligible for TANF, or successor program, will not have their benefits reduced and will not lose the supplemental benefits extended to them as TANF, or successor program, recipients for the life of the escrow account as defined in this section. Participants must notify the department of human services in advance of their decision to elect this option.

Acts 1996, ch. 886, § 3.

71-3-904. Reapplication for exemption.

The exemption in §71-3-903 can be reapplied for whenever the participant is eligible for temporary assistance for needy families (TANF), or successor program.

Acts 1996, ch. 886, § 4.

71-3-905. Eligibility for exemption.

Under this section, self-employment will be considered the same as a job component, if the individual's income, divided by the minimum wage, equals at a minimum twenty (20) hours per week. To receive the self-employment exemption outlined in this part, low-income entrepreneurs must be enrolled in the job component of the temporary assistance for needy families (TANF) or successor program, and must be enrolled in a micro-lending program providing entrepreneurship training, technical assistance and peer support.

Acts 1996, ch. 886, § 5.

71-3-906. Micro-lending program.

A micro-lending program is one that provides training, technical assistance and loan funds to low-income entrepreneurs to start or expand a business venture.

Acts 1996, ch. 886, § 6.

71-3-907. Program dependent on federal waivers.

The program is dependent on the availability of appropriate waivers from the federal departments of health and human services and agriculture, for which the department of human services is authorized to make application.

Acts 1996, ch. 886, § 7.